California statutes. Family Code
 institution or company, provided that the funds transferred shall continue to be held in trust, and subject to this part and that the transferring financial institution or company has provided written notice to the financial institution or company to which the funds will be transferred that the funds are subject to this section and written notice of the requirements of this part.

(3) The financial institution or company may use all or a part of the funds to purchase, in the name of and for the benefit of the minor, either of the following: 

(A) Investment funds offered by a company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, provided that if the underlying investments are equity securities, the investment fund is a broad-based index fund or invests broadly across the domestic or a foreign regional economy, is not a sector fund, and has assets under management of at least
 two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000).

(B) Government securities and bonds, certificates of deposit, money market instruments, money market accounts, or mutual funds investing solely in those government securities and bonds, certificates, instruments, and accounts that are available at the financial institution where the trust fund or other savings plan is held, provided that the funds shall continue to be held in trust and subject to this part, those purchases shall have a maturity date on or before the date upon which the minor will attain the age of majority, and any proceeds accruing from those purchases shall be redeposited into that account or accounts or used to further purchase any of those or similar securities, bonds, certificates, instruments, funds, or accounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6654.

If a vlogger knowingly violates this part or should have known they were in violation of this part, a minor satisfying the criteria described in subdivision (a) of Section 6651 may commence an action to enforce the provisions of this part. The court may award, to a minor who prevails in any action brought in accordance with this part, any of the following damages:

(a) Actual damages.

(b) Punitive damages.

(c) Cost of the action, including attorney’s fees and litigation costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6655.

(a) This part does not affect a right or remedy available under any other law of the state.

(b) This part does not have any effect on a minor who produces their own content.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6656.

This part shall not apply to a contract for vlogging services between a minor and their parent or guardian only if a court approves the contract pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 6751. In determining whether to approve such a contract, the court shall consider whether the terms of the contract are at least as beneficial to the minor as the compensation the minor would otherwise receive under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 611, Sec. 1.   (SB 764)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. CONTRACTS [6700. - 6753.]



  CHAPTER 1. Capacity to Contract [6700. - 6701.]

6700.

Except as provided in Section 6701, a minor may make a contract in the same manner as an adult, subject to the power of disaffirmance under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 6710), and subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 300) of Division 3 (validity of marriage).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6701.

A minor cannot do any of the following:

(a) Give a delegation of power.

(b) Make a contract relating to real property or any interest therein.

(c) Make a contract relating to any personal property not in the immediate possession or control of the minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Disaffirmance of Contracts [6710. - 6713.]

6710.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, a contract of a minor may be disaffirmed by the minor before majority or within a reasonable time afterwards or, in case of the minor’s death within that period, by the minor’s heirs or personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6711.

A minor cannot disaffirm an obligation, otherwise valid, entered into by the minor under the express authority or direction of a statute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6712.

A contract, otherwise valid, entered into during minority, may not be disaffirmed on that ground either during the actual minority of the person entering into the contract, or at any time thereafter, if all of the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) The contract is to pay the reasonable value of things necessary for the support of the minor or the minor’s family.

(b) These things have been actually furnished to the minor or to the minor’s family.

(c) The contract is entered into by the minor when not under the care of a parent or guardian able to provide for the minor or the minor’s family.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6713.

If, before the contract of a minor is disaffirmed, goods the minor has sold are transferred to another purchaser who bought them in good faith for value and without notice of the transferor’s defect of title, the minor cannot recover the goods from an innocent purchaser.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Contracts in Art, Entertainment, and Professional Sports [6750. - 6753.]

6750.

(a) This chapter applies to the following types of contracts entered into between an unemancipated minor and a third party on or after January 1, 2000:

(1) A contract pursuant to which a minor is employed or agrees to render artistic or creative services, either directly or through a third party, including, but not limited to, a personal services corporation (loan-out company), or through a casting agency. “Artistic or creative services” includes, but is not limited to, services as an actor, actress, dancer, musician, comedian, singer, stuntperson, voice-over artist,
 content creator, or other performer or entertainer, or as a songwriter, musical producer or arranger, writer, director, producer, production executive, choreographer, composer, conductor, or designer.

(2) A contract pursuant to which a minor agrees to purchase, or otherwise secure, sell, lease, license, or otherwise dispose of literary, musical, or dramatic properties, or use of a person’s likeness, voice recording, performance, or story of or incidents in the person’s life, either tangible or intangible, or any rights therein for use in motion pictures, television, the production of sound recordings in any format now known or hereafter devised, the legitimate or living stage, or otherwise in the entertainment field.

(3) A contract pursuant to which a minor is employed
 or agrees to render services as a participant or player in a sport.

(b) (1) If a minor is employed or agrees to render services directly for a person or entity, that person or entity shall be considered the minor’s employer for purposes of this chapter.

(2) If a minor’s services are being rendered through a third-party individual or personal services corporation (loan-out company), the person to whom or entity to which that third party is providing the minor’s services shall be considered the minor’s employer for purposes of this chapter.

(3) If a minor renders services as an extra, background performer, or in a similar capacity through an agency or service that provides one or more of those
 performers for a fee (casting agency), the agency or service shall be considered the minor’s employer for the purposes of this chapter.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Content creator” means an individual who creates, posts, shares, or otherwise interacts with digital content on an online platform and engages in a direct contractual relationship with third parties. Content creators include, but are not limited to, vloggers, podcasters, social media influencers, and streamers.

(2) “Online platform” means any public-facing internet website, web application, or digital application, including, but not limited to, social media platforms as defined in Section 22675 of the Business and
 Professions Code, advertising networks, mobile applications, mobile operating systems, search engines, email services, and internet access services.

(d) (1) For purposes of this chapter, the minor’s “gross earnings” means the total compensation payable to the minor under the contract or, if the minor’s services are being rendered through a third-party individual or personal services corporation (loan-out company), the total compensation payable to that third party for the services of the minor.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), with respect to contracts pursuant to which a minor is employed or agrees to render services as a musician, singer, songwriter, musical producer, or arranger only, for purposes of this chapter, the minor’s “gross earnings” means the
 total amount paid to the minor pursuant to the contract, including the payment of any advances to the minor pursuant to the contract, but excluding deductions to offset those advances or other expenses incurred by the employer pursuant to the contract, or, if the minor’s services are being rendered through a third-party individual or personal services corporation (loan-out company), the total amount payable to that third party for the services of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   (AB 1880)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6751.

(a) A contract, otherwise valid, of a type described in Section 6750, entered into during minority, cannot be disaffirmed on that ground either during the minority of the person entering into the contract, or at any time thereafter, if the contract has been approved by the superior court in any county in which the minor resides or is employed or in which any party to the contract has its principal office in this state for the transaction of business.

(b) Approval of the court may be given on petition of any party to the contract, after such reasonable notice to all other parties to the contract as is fixed by the court, with opportunity to such other parties to appear and be heard.

(c) Approval of the court given under this section extends to the whole of the contract and all of its terms and provisions, including, but not limited to, any optional or conditional provisions contained in the contract for
 extension, prolongation, or termination of the term of the contract.

(d) For the purposes of any proceeding under this chapter, a parent or legal guardian, as the case may be, entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of the minor at the time of the proceeding shall be considered the minor’s guardian ad litem for the proceeding, unless the court shall determine that appointment of a different individual as guardian ad litem is required in the best interests of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 940, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6752.

(a) A parent or guardian entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of a minor who enters into a contract of a type described in Section 6750 shall provide a certified copy of the minor’s birth certificate indicating the minor’s minority to the other party or parties to the contract and in addition, in the case of a guardian, a certified copy of the court document appointing the person as the minor’s legal guardian.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other statute, in an order approving a minor’s contract of a type described in Section 6750, the court shall require that 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract be set aside by the minor’s
 employer, except an employer of a minor for services as an extra, background
 performer, or in a similar capacity, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 6750. These amounts shall be held in trust, in an account or other savings plan, and preserved for the benefit of the minor in accordance with Section 6753.

(2) The court shall require that at least one parent or legal guardian, as the case may be, entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of the minor at the time the order is issued be appointed as trustee of the funds ordered to be set aside in trust for the benefit of the minor, unless the court shall determine that appointment of a different individual, individuals, entity, or entities as trustee or trustees is required in the best interest of the minor.

(3) Within 10 business days after commencement of employment,
 the trustee or trustees of the funds ordered to be set aside in trust shall provide the minor’s employer with a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753. Upon presentation of the trustee’s statement offered pursuant to this subdivision, the employer shall provide the parent or guardian with a written acknowledgment of receipt of the statement.

(4) The minor’s employer shall deposit or disburse the 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract within 15 business days after receiving a true and accurate copy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6753, a certified copy of the minor’s birth certificate, and, in the case of a guardian, a certified copy of the court document appointing the person as the minor’s guardian. Notwithstanding any other law,
 pending receipt of these documents, the minor’s employer shall hold, for the benefit of the minor, the 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract. This paragraph does not apply to an employer of a minor for services as an extra, background performer, or in a similar capacity, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 6750.

(5) When making the initial deposit of funds, the minor’s employer shall provide written notification to the financial institution or company that the funds are subject to Section 6753. Upon receipt of the court order, the minor’s employer shall provide the financial institution with a copy of the order.

(6) Once the minor’s employer deposits the set-aside funds pursuant to Section 6753, in trust, in an account or other
 savings
 plan, the minor’s employer shall have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds. The trustee or trustees of the trust shall be the only individual, individuals, entity, or entities with the obligation or duty to monitor and account for those funds once they have been deposited by the minor’s employer. The trustee or trustees shall do an annual accounting of the funds held in trust, in an account or other savings plan, in accordance with Sections 16062 and 16063 of the Probate Code.

(7) The court shall have continuing jurisdiction over the trust established pursuant to the order and may at any time, upon petition of the parent or legal guardian, the minor, through the minor’s guardian ad litem, or the trustee or trustees, on good cause shown, order that the trust be amended or terminated, notwithstanding the
 provisions of the declaration of trust. An order amending or terminating a trust may be made only after reasonable notice to the beneficiary and, if the beneficiary is then a minor, to the parent or guardian, if any, and to the trustee or trustees of the funds with opportunity for all parties to appear and be heard.

(8) A parent or guardian entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of the minor shall promptly notify the minor’s
 employer, in writing, of any change in facts that affect the employer’s obligation or ability to set aside the funds in accordance with the order, including, but not limited to, a change of financial institution or account number, or the existence of a new or amended order issued pursuant to paragraph (7) amending or terminating the employer’s obligations under this section. The written notification shall be accompanied by a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753 and, if applicable, a true and accurate photocopy of the new or amended order.

(9) (A) If a parent, guardian, or trustee fails to provide the minor’s employer with a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753 within 180 days after the commencement of
 employment, the employer shall forward to The Actors’ Fund of America 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract, together with the minor’s name and, if known, the minor’s social security number, birth date, last known address, telephone number, email address, dates of employment, and title of the project on which the minor was employed, and shall notify the parent, guardian, or trustee of that transfer by certified mail to the last known address. Upon receipt of those forwarded funds, The Actors’ Fund of America shall become the trustee of those funds and the minor’s employer shall have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds.

(B) The Actors’ Fund of America shall make its best efforts to notify the parent, guardian, or trustee of their responsibilities to provide a true and accurate photocopy
 of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753, and in the case of a guardian, a certified copy of the court document appointing the person as the minor’s legal guardian. Within 15 business days after receiving those documents, The Actors’ Fund of America shall deposit or disburse the funds as directed by the trustee’s statement. When making that deposit or disbursal of the funds, The Actors’ Fund of America shall provide to the financial institution notice that the funds are subject to Section 6753 and a copy of each applicable order, and shall thereafter have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds.

(C) The Actors’ Fund of America shall notify each beneficiary of their entitlement to the funds that it holds for the beneficiary within 60 days after the date on which its records indicated that the
 beneficiary has attained 18 years of age or the date on which it received notice that the minor has been emancipated, by sending that notice to the last known address for the beneficiary or, if it has no specific separate address for the beneficiary, to the beneficiary’s parent or guardian.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other statute, for any minor’s contract of a type described in Section 6750 that is not being submitted for approval by the court pursuant to Section 6751, or for which the court has issued a final order denying approval, 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract shall be set aside by the minor’s employer, except an employer of a minor for services as an extra, background performer, or in a similar capacity, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 6750.
 These amounts shall be held in trust, in an account or other savings plan, and preserved for the benefit of the minor in accordance with Section 6753. At least one parent or legal guardian, as the case may be, entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of the minor, shall be the trustee of the funds set aside for the benefit of the minor, unless the court, upon petition by the parent or legal guardian, the minor, through the minor’s guardian ad litem, or the trustee or trustees of the trust, shall determine that appointment of a different individual, individuals, entity, or entities as trustee or trustees is required in the best interest of the minor.

(2) Within 10 business days of commencement after employment, a parent or guardian, as the case may be, entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of the minor shall provide the
 minor’s employer with a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753 and in addition, in the case of a guardian, a certified copy of the court document appointing the person as the minor’s legal guardian. Upon presentation of the trustee’s statement offered pursuant to this subdivision, the employer shall provide the parent or guardian with a written acknowledgment of receipt of the statement.

(3) The minor’s employer shall deposit 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract within 15 business days of receiving the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753, or if the court denies approval of the contract, within 15 business days of receiving a final order denying approval of the contract. Notwithstanding any other statute, pending receipt of the trustee’s statement or the final court
 order, the minor’s employer shall hold for the benefit of the minor the 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract. When making the initial deposit of funds, the minor’s employer shall provide written notification to the financial institution or company that the funds are subject to Section 6753. This paragraph does not apply to an employer of a minor for services as an extra, background performer, or in a similar capacity, as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 6750.

(4) Once the minor’s employer deposits the set-aside funds in trust, in an account or other savings plan pursuant to Section 6753, the minor’s employer shall have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds. The trustee or trustees of the trust shall be the only individual, individuals, entity, or entities
 with the obligation or duty to monitor and account for those funds once they have been deposited by the minor’s employer. The trustee or trustees shall do an annual accounting of the funds held in trust, in an account or other savings plan, in accordance with Sections 16062 and 16063 of the Probate Code.

(5) Upon petition of the parent or legal guardian, the minor, through the minor’s guardian ad litem, or the trustee or trustees of the trust, to the superior court in a county in which the minor resides or in which the trust is established, the court may at any time, on good cause shown, order that the trust be amended or terminated, notwithstanding the provisions of the declaration of trust. An order amending or terminating a trust may be made only after reasonable notice to the beneficiary and, if the beneficiary is then a minor, to the
 parent or guardian, if any, and to the trustee or trustees of the funds with opportunity for all parties to appear and be heard.

(6) A parent or guardian entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of the minor shall promptly notify the minor’s employer in writing of any change in facts that affect the employer’s obligation or ability to set aside funds for the benefit of the minor in accordance with this section, including, but not limited to, a change of financial institution or account number, or the existence of a new or amended order issued pursuant to paragraph (5) amending or terminating the employer’s obligations under this section. The written notification shall be accompanied by a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement and attachments pursuant to Section 6753 and, if applicable, a true and accurate photocopy
 of the new or amended order.

(7) (A) If a parent, guardian, or trustee fails to provide the minor’s employer with a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753, within 180 days after commencement of employment, the employer shall forward to The Actors’ Fund of America the 15 percent of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to the contract, together with the minor’s name and, if known, the minor’s social security number, birth date, last known address, telephone number, email address, dates of employment, and the title of the project on which the minor was employed, and shall notify the parent, guardian, or trustee of that transfer by certified mail to the last known address. Upon receipt of those forwarded funds, The Actors’ Fund of America shall become the trustee of those funds
 and the minor’s employer shall have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds.

(B) The Actors’ Fund of America shall make best efforts to notify the parent, guardian, or trustee of their responsibilities to provide a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753 and in the case of a guardian, a certified copy of the court document appointing the person as the minor’s legal guardian. After receiving those documents, The Actors’ Fund
 of America shall deposit or disburse the funds as directed by the trustee’s statement, and in accordance with Section 6753, within 15 business days. When making that deposit or disbursal of the funds, The Actors’ Fund of America shall provide notice to the financial institution that the funds are subject to Section 6753, and shall thereafter have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds.

(C) The Actors’ Fund of America shall notify each beneficiary of their entitlement to the funds that it holds for the beneficiary, within 60 days after the date on which its records indicate that the beneficiary has attained 18 years of age or the date on which it received notice that the minor has been emancipated, by sending that notice to the last known address that it has for the beneficiary, or to the
 beneficiary’s parent or guardian, where it has no specific separate address for the beneficiary.

(d) Where a parent or guardian is entitled to the physical custody, care, and control of a minor who enters into a contract of a type described in Section 6750, the relationship between the parent or guardian and the minor is a fiduciary relationship that is governed by the law of trusts, whether or not a court has issued a formal order to that effect. The parent or guardian acting in a fiduciary relationship, shall, with the earnings and accumulations of the minor under the contract, pay all liabilities incurred by the minor under the contract, including, but not limited to, payments for taxes on all earnings, including taxes on the amounts set aside under subdivisions (b) and (c) of this section, and payments for personal or professional
 services rendered to the minor or the business related to the contract. This subdivision does not alter any other existing responsibilities of a parent or legal guardian to provide for the support of a minor child.

(e) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, The Actors’ Fund of America, as trustee of unclaimed set-aside funds, shall manage and administer those funds in the same manner as a trustee under the Probate Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, The Actors’ Fund of America is not required to open separate, segregated individual trust accounts for each beneficiary but may hold the set-aside funds in a single, segregated master account for all beneficiaries, provided it maintains accounting records for each beneficiary’s interest in the master account.

(2) The Actors’ Fund of America shall have the right to transfer funds from the master account, or from a beneficiary’s segregated account to its general account in an amount equal to the beneficiary’s balance. The Actors’ Fund of America shall have the right to use those funds transferred to its general account to provide programs and services for young performers. This use of the funds does not limit or alter The Actors’ Fund of America’s obligation to disburse the set-aside funds to the beneficiary, or the beneficiary’s parent, guardian, trustee, or estate pursuant to this chapter.

(3) (A) Upon receiving a certified copy of the beneficiary’s birth certificate, or United States passport, and a true and accurate photocopy of the trustee’s statement pursuant to Section 6753, The Actors’ Fund of America shall
 transfer the beneficiary’s balance to the trust account established for the beneficiary.

(B) The Actors’ Fund of America shall disburse the set-aside funds to a beneficiary who has attained 18 years of age, after receiving proof of the beneficiary’s identity and a certified copy of the beneficiary’s birth certificate or United States passport, or to a beneficiary who has been emancipated, after receiving proof of the beneficiary’s identity and appropriate documentation evidencing the beneficiary’s emancipation.

(C) The Actors’ Fund of America shall disburse the set-aside funds to the estate of a deceased beneficiary after receiving appropriate documentation evidencing the death of the beneficiary and the claimant’s authority to collect those funds on behalf of the beneficiary.

(f) (1) The beneficiary of an account held by The Actors’ Fund of America pursuant to this section shall be entitled to receive imputed interest on the balance in the account for the entire period during which the account is held at a rate equal to the lesser of the federal reserve rate in effect on the last business day of the prior calendar quarter or the national average money market rate as published in the New York Times on the last Sunday of the prior calendar quarter, adjusted quarterly.

(2) The Actors’ Fund of America may assess and deduct from the balance in the beneficiary’s account reasonable management, administrative, and investment expenses, including beneficiary-specific fees for initial setup, account notifications and account disbursements,
 and a reasonably allocable share of management, administrative, and investment expenses of the master account. Fees may not be charged to a beneficiary’s account during the first year that the account is held by The Actors’ Fund of America.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), the amount paid on any claim made by a beneficiary or the beneficiary’s parent or guardian after The Actors’ Fund of America receives and holds funds pursuant to this section may not be less than the amount of the funds received plus the imputed interest.

(g) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a minor’s employer holding set-aside funds under this chapter, which funds remain unclaimed 180 days after the effective date hereof, shall forward those unclaimed funds to The Actors’ Fund of
 America, along with the minor’s name and, if known, the minor’s social security number, birth date, last known address, telephone number, email address, dates of employment, and the title of the project on which the minor was employed, and shall notify the parent, guardian, or trustee of that transfer by certified mail to the last known address. Upon receipt of those forwarded funds by The Actors’ Fund of America, the minor’s employer shall have no further obligation or duty to monitor or account for the funds.

(h) All funds received by The Actors’ Fund of America pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the application of the Unclaimed Property Law (Title 10 (commencing with Section 1300) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure), including, but not limited to, Section 1510 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 75.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

6753.

(a) The trustee or trustees shall establish a trust account, that shall be known as a Coogan Trust Account, pursuant to this section at a bank, savings and loan institution, credit union, brokerage firm, or company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, that is located in the State of California, unless a similar trust has been previously established, for the purpose of preserving for the benefit of the minor the portion of the minor’s gross earnings pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 6752 or pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 6752. The trustee or trustees shall establish the trust pursuant to this section within seven business days after the minor’s contract is signed by the minor, the third-party individual or personal services corporation (loan-out company), and the employer.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, prior to the date on which the beneficiary of the trust
 attains the age of 18 years or the issuance of a declaration of emancipation of the minor under Section 7122, no withdrawal by the beneficiary or any other individual, individuals, entity, or entities may be made of funds on deposit in trust without written order of the superior court pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 6752. Upon reaching the age of 18 years, the beneficiary may withdraw the funds on deposit in trust only after providing a certified copy of the beneficiary’s birth certificate to the financial institution where the trust is located.

(c) The trustee or trustees shall, within 10 business days after the minor’s contract is signed by the minor, the third-party individual or personal services corporation (loan-out company), and the employer, prepare a written statement under penalty of perjury that shall include the name, address, and telephone number of the financial institution, the name of the account, the
 number of the account, the name of the minor beneficiary, the name of the trustee or trustees of the account, and any additional information needed by the minor’s employer to deposit into the account the portion of the minor’s gross earnings prescribed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 6752. The trustee or trustees shall attach to the written statement a true and accurate photocopy of any information received from the financial institution confirming the creation of the account, such as an account agreement, account terms, passbook, or other similar writings.

(d) The trust shall be established in California either with a financial institution that is and remains insured at all times by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC), the Securities Investor Protection Corporation (SIPC), or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund (NCUSIF) or their respective successors, or with a company that is and remains registered under
 the Investment Company Act of 1940. The trustee or trustees of the trust shall be the only individual, individuals, entity, or entities with the obligation or duty to ensure that the funds remain in trust, in an account or other savings plan insured in accordance with this section, or with a company that is and remains registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 as authorized by this section.

(e) Upon application by the trustee or trustees to the financial institution or company in which the trust is held, the trust funds shall be handled by the financial institution or company in one or more of the following methods:

(1) The financial institution or company may transfer funds to another account or other savings plan at the same financial institution or company, provided that the funds transferred shall continue to be held in trust, and subject to this chapter.

(2) The financial institution or company may transfer
 funds to another financial institution or company, provided that the funds transferred shall continue to be held in trust, and subject to this chapter and that the transferring financial institution or company has provided written notification to the financial institution or company to which the funds will be transferred that the funds are subject to this section and written notice of the requirements of this chapter.

(3) The financial institution or company may use all or a part of the funds to purchase, in the name of and for the benefit of the minor, (A) investment funds offered by a company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, provided that if the underlying investments are equity securities, the investment fund is a broad-based index fund or invests broadly across the domestic or a foreign regional economy, is not a sector fund, and has assets under management of at least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000); or (B) government securities and
 bonds, certificates of deposit, money market instruments, money market accounts, or mutual funds investing solely in those government securities and bonds, certificates, instruments, and accounts, that are available at the financial institution where the trust fund or other savings plan is held, provided that the funds shall continue to be held in trust and subject to this chapter, those purchases shall have a maturity date on or before the date upon which the minor will attain the age of 18 years, and any proceeds accruing from those purchases shall be redeposited into that account or accounts or used to further purchase any of those or similar securities, bonds, certificates, instruments, funds, or accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 667, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. MEDICAL TREATMENT [6900. - 6930.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [6900. - 6904.]

6900.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.

“Dental care” means X-ray examination, anesthetic, dental or surgical diagnosis or treatment, and hospital care by a dentist licensed under the Dental Practice Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6902.

“Medical care” means X-ray examination, anesthetic, medical or surgical diagnosis or treatment, and hospital care under the general or special supervision and upon the advice of or to be rendered by a physician and surgeon licensed under the Medical Practice Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.

“Parent or guardian” means either parent if both parents have legal custody, or the parent or person having legal custody, or the guardian, of a minor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6904.

“Vision care” means the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, and management of disorders, diseases, and dysfunctions of the visual system and the provision of habilitative or rehabilitative optometric services by an optometrist licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Chapter 7 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   (SB 457)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Consent by Person Having Care of Minor or by Court [6910. - 6911.]

6910.

The parent, guardian, or caregiver of a minor who is a relative of the minor and who may authorize medical care and dental care under Section 6550, may authorize in writing an adult into whose care a minor has been entrusted to consent to medical care or dental care, or both, for the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6911.
